Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.541

Role of prosecutor or attorney general.

(1) In a case arising under this chapter or involving the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the prosecutor or attorney general may take any lawful action, including resorting to a proceeding under this article or any other available civil proceeding to locate a child, obtain the return of a child, or enforce a child custody determination if there is:

(a) An existing child custody determination;

(b) A request to do so from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

(c) A reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or

(d) A reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in violation of the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

(2) A prosecutor or attorney general acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and may not represent any party.

[ 2001 c 65 s 315.]